Utah statutes.
53A-11a-402.   Other forms of legal redress.
(1)  Nothing in this chapter prohibits a victim of bullying, hazing, or
retaliation from seeking legal redress under any other provisions of civil or
criminal law.
(2)  This section does not create or alter tort liability.
